Maryland, session 2026, SB0784.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Financial Institutions
[11–102.
(a) In this section, “installment loan” has the meaning stated in § 11–301 of this
title.
(b) Except for § 11–219 of this title, this title does not apply to a person that
acquires or is assigned in whole or in part:
(1) A mortgage, if the person does not otherwise make mortgages;
(2) A mortgage loan, as defined in § 11–501 of this title, if the person does
not otherwise engage in the mortgage lending business, as defined in § 11–501 of this title;
or
(3) An installment loan, if the person:
(i) Relies on another person to service or collect on the installment
loan; and
(ii) Does not otherwise make installment loans.
– 1 –

Ch. 40 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) This section may not be construed to alter the definition of “student loan
servicer”, as defined in § 2–104.1 of this article.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that Section 1 of this Act be construed as a clarifying corrective measure to repeal
a provision of law erroneously enacted by Chapter 118 of the Acts of the General Assembly
of 2025.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 2 –